District of Columbia statutes.
21-2022

Practice in court.

Unless specifically provided to the contrary in this chapter or inconsistent with its provisions, the rules of the court, including the rules concerning vacation of orders and appellate review, govern proceedings under this chapter.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-2022.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1-304 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).